el: Θέση εκκεντροφόρου: Κέντρο; Εξαγωγή; Μπροστινή πλευρά (bank); Εισαγωγή; Εισαγωγή και εξαγωγή (σετ); Αριστερή πλευρά (bank); Πίσω πλευρά (bank); Δεξιά πλευρά (bank); Άλλο
es: Posición del árbol de levas: Central; Escape; Banco delantero; Admisión; Admisión y escape (conjunto); Banco izquierdo; Banco trasero; Banco derecho; Otro
pt-PT: Posição da árvore de cames: Centro; Escape; Bancada frontal; Admissão; Admissão e escape (conjunto); Bancada esquerda; Bancada traseira; Bancada direita; Outro
lt-LT: Skirstomojo veleno padėtis: Centrinis; Išmetimo; Priekinės eilės; Įsiurbimo; Įsiurbimo ir išmetimo (komplektas); Kairiosios eilės; Galinės eilės; Dešiniosios eilės; Kita
sv: Kamaxelns position: Mitten; Avgas; Främre cylinderbank; Insug; Insug och avgas (set); Vänster cylinderbank; Bakre cylinderbank; Höger cylinderbank; Övrigt
pt-BR: Posição do eixo de comando: Central; Exaustão; Bancada dianteira; Admissão; Admissão e exaustão (conjunto); Bancada esquerda; Bancada traseira; Bancada direita; Outro
de: Nockenwellenposition: Mitte; Auslass; Vordere Zylinderbank; Einlass; Einlass & Auslass (Set); Linke Zylinderbank; Hintere Zylinderbank; Rechte Zylinderbank; Sonstige
vi: Vị trí trục cam: Chính giữa; Xả; Dãy trước; Nạp; Nạp & xả (bộ); Dãy trái; Dãy sau; Dãy phải; Khác
hr-HR: Položaj bregastog vratila: Središnje; Ispuh; Prednji red; Usis; Usis i ispuh (komplet); Lijevi red; Stražnji red; Desni red; Ostalo
hu: Vezérműtengely helyzete: Középső; Kipufogó; Első hengersor; Szívó; Szívó és kipufogó (készlet); Bal hengersor; Hátsó hengersor; Jobb hengersor; Egyéb
en: Camshaft position: Center; Exhaust; Front bank; Intake; Intake & exhaust (set); Left bank; Rear bank; Right bank; Other
ko: 캠축 위치: 센터; 배기; 프론트 뱅크; 흡기; 흡기 및 배기(세트); 레프트 뱅크; 리어 뱅크; 라이트 뱅크; 기타
nb: Kamakselposisjon: Senter; Eksos; Fremre sylinderrekke; Inntak; Inntak og eksos (sett); Venstre sylinderrekke; Bakre sylinderrekke; Høyre sylinderrekke; Annet
ru: Положение распределительного вала: По центру; Выпускной; Передний ряд; Впускной; Впускной и выпускной (комплект); Левый ряд; Задний ряд; Правый ряд; Другое
fr: Position de l’arbre à cames: Central; Échappement; Banc avant; Admission; Admission et échappement (ensemble); Banc gauche; Banc arrière; Banc droit; Autre
da: Knastakselposition: I midten; Udstødning; Forreste cylinderrække; Indsugning; Indsugning og udstødning (sæt); Venstre cylinderrække; Bageste cylinderrække; Højre cylinderrække; Andet
sl-SI: Položaj odmične gredi: Sredina; Izpušni; Sprednja vrsta valjev; Sesalni; Sesalni in izpušni (komplet); Leva vrsta valjev; Zadnja vrsta valjev; Desna vrsta valjev; Drugo
pl: Pozycja wałka rozrządu: Środkowy; Wydechowy; Przedni rząd; Ssący; Ssący i wydechowy (zestaw); Lewy rząd; Tylny rząd; Prawy rząd; Inne
fi: Nokka-akselin asento: Keski; Pako; Etulohko; Imu; Imu ja pako (sarja); Vasen lohko; Takalohko; Oikea lohko; Muu
nl: Nokkenas positie: Midden; Uitlaat; Voorste bank; Inlaat; Inlaat en uitlaat (set); Linker bank; Achterste bank; Rechter bank; Overig
it: posizione dell'albero a camme: Centrale; Scarico; Bancata anteriore; Aspirazione; Aspirazione e scarico (set); Bancata sinistra; Bancata posteriore; Bancata destra; Altro
cs: Poloha vačkového hřídele: Střední; Výfuková; Přední řada; Sací; Sací a výfuková (sada); Levá řada; Zadní řada; Pravá řada; Jiná
ja: カムシャフトの位置: センター; エキゾースト; フロントバンク; インテーク; インテークとエキゾースト (セット); レフトバンク; リアバンク; ライトバンク; その他
zh-CN: 凸轮轴位置: 中心; 排气; 前排气缸; 进气; 进气与排气（组合）; 左排气缸; 后排气缸; 右排气缸; 其他
th: ตำแหน่งเพลาลูกเบี้ยว: กลาง; ไอเสีย; แบงก์หน้า; ไอดี; ไอดีและไอเสีย (ชุด); แบงก์ซ้าย; แบงก์หลัง; แบงก์ขวา; อื่นๆ
tr: Eksantrik mili konumu: Orta; Egzoz; Ön sıra; Emme; Emme ve egzoz (set); Sol sıra; Arka sıra; Sağ sıra; Diğer
bg-BG: Положение на разпределителния вал: В центъра; Изпускателен; Преден ред (банка); Всмукателен; Всмукателен и изпускателен (комплект); Ляв ред (банка); Заден ред (банка); Десен ред (банка); Други
sk-SK: Poloha vačkového hriadeľa: V strede; Výfuk; Predný rad valcov; Sanie; Sanie a výfuk (súprava); Ľavý rad valcov; Zadný rad valcov; Pravý rad valcov; Iné
zh-TW: 凸輪軸位置: 中央; 排氣; 前排; 進氣; 進氣和排氣 (套組); 左排; 後排; 右排; 其他
ro-RO: Poziția arborelui cu came: Centru; Evacuare; Bancul frontal; Admisie; Admisie și evacuare (set); Bancul stâng; Bancul spate; Bancul drept; Altele